Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-506
Lawful burning of property; training and safety promotion purposes; permit.

Property may be lawfully destroyed by burning such structures as condemned by law, structures no longer having any value for habitation or business or no longer serving any useful value in the area in which situated, and any other combustible material that will serve to be used for test fires to educate and train members of organized fire departments and promote fire safety anywhere in Nebraska. Before any structure may be destroyed by fire for training and educational purposes it must be reported to the State Fire Marshal and a permit issued for that purpose. Any expense incurred in burning a structure shall be assumed by the organized fire department requesting this type of training for members of its department.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 105.